South Dakota, session 2026, HB1204.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-24:
There is created the South Dakota school building construction loan fund, to be
administered by the Department of Education commissioner of school and public lands,
for the purpose of making loans to school districts to construct or expand a school building,
as provided in section 2 of this Act.
Any interest earned on moneys in the fund must remain in the fund. Any repayment
of the principal amount of a loan must be deposited into the fund and used for making
new loans. Money in the fund designated for loans is continuously appropriated through
the general appropriation bill for the purposes provided in section 2 of this Act.
The secretary of the department commissioner shall approve vouchers, and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized from this fund.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-24:
The Department of Education commissioner of school and public lands may make
loans from the South Dakota school building construction fund, created in section 1 of this
Act, to a school district for the purpose of constructing or expanding a school building.
The amount of the loan may not exceed forty percent of the total cost of the construction
or expansion project. The department commissioner may use up to one percent of the
principal amount of a loan to offset the department's expenses in administering the loan.
Any loan made by the department commissioner must be provided to the district
at an interest rate of zero percent. The terms of the loan may not require collateral from
the district.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1204C 2 1204
The terms of the loan must require that the payments be based on a straight and
level amortization of twenty years and be made annually over a term of twenty years,
with the first payment due one year from the date of the funding of the loan.
The department shall make available moneys from the South Dakota school
construction fund, created in section 1 of this Act, as follows:
(1) Thirty percent for the construction or expansion of a school building in a school
district that has four thousand or more students; and
(2) Seventy percent for the construction or expansion of a school building in all other
school districts.
For purposes of this section, a "school building" is a structure that houses the
academic instruction, extracurricular activities, and other functions of a kindergarten
through twelfth grade educational program.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-24:
A school district is not eligible for a loan under section 2 of this Act if:
(1) The school district is eligible for a loan under § 11-15-8; or
(2) The municipality in which the district is headquartered is less than ten miles from
a municipality in which another school district is headquartered; or
(3) The school district has a fall enrollment of fewer than two one hundred fifty
students and is not designated as a sparse school district, as defined in § 13-13-
78.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-24:
The School Finance Accountability Board within the Department of Education
commissioner of school and public lands shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-
26, specifying:
(1) The process by which:
(a) A school district applies for a loan;
(b) The department commissioner reviews, assesses, and approves a school
district's application; and
(c) The department commissioner disburses a loan to a school district; and
(2) The information a school district must provide when applying for a loan pursuant
to section 2 of this Act, including:
(a) The amount of money currently in the district's capital outlay fund;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1204C 3 1204
(b) The amount of money the district has transferred and the number of
transfers the district has made from the capital outlay fund, pursuant to
§ 13-16-6 during the previous ten years;
(c) The district's current levy for the capital outlay fund;
(d) The district's fall enrollment for the current fiscal year; and
(e) The enrollment trends of the district during the previous ten years; and
(3) The criteria by which the department commissioner assesses a school district's
application for a loan in accordance with section 2 of this Act, including:
(a) The minimum amount of money, in proportion to the district's fall
enrollment, that which must currently be in a district's capital outlay fund;
(b) The maximum amount of money a district may have transferred from the
capital outlay fund, pursuant to § 13-16-6 during the previous ten years;
(c) The maximum levy a district may currently have set for the district's capital
outlay fund; and
(d) The minimum increase necessary in the district's capital outlay levy to be
sufficient for the district to repay the loan.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-24:
On or before August first of each year, the Department of Education commissioner
of school and public lands shall submit a report to the special committee, created in § 4-
8A-2, detailing the number, amounts, and recipients of loans provided by from the South
Dakota school building construction fund created in section 1 of this Act, and other relevant
information pertaining to the fund or program, as requested by the committee.
Section 6. The state treasurer shall transfer $1 from the general fund to the South Dakota
school building construction fund created in section 1 of this Act. The amount transferred in
this section is appropriated to the Department of Education commissioner of school and public
lands for the purpose described in section 2 of this Act.
Section 7. This Act is effective beginning June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.